District of Columbia statutes.
16-4007

Emergency order.

During a collaborative law process, the tribunal may issue emergency orders to protect the health, safety, welfare, or interest of a party, family member, or other person, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
This section is referenced in § 16-4006.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 7 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.